Texas, session 892, HB264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter B, Chapter 305, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 305.0305 to read as follows: Sec. 305.0305.  PROHIBITED RECEIPT OF STATE FUNDS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a registrant may not receive state funds under a contract with this state or as compensation for services provided as an employee of this state. (b)  This section does not apply to state funds a registrant receives as part of a retirement benefit or other benefit related to the registrant's previous service as an employee of or contractor for this state. SECTION 2.  Section 305.0305, Government Code, as added by this Act, applies only to state funds received by a person required to register under Chapter 305, Government Code, on or after the effective date of this Act. State funds received by a person required to register under that chapter before the effective date of this Act are governed by the law in effect on the date the funds were received, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.